phonology/05_vowels.xfst
!
! 05_vowels.xfst - Vowel Reduction Rules
! Propretonic and pretonic vowel reduction
!
! References: Joüon-Muraoka §§9-10, GKC §§9-10
!

!
! ============================================================
! VOWEL DEFINITIONS
! ============================================================

define SHORT    [ a | e | i | o | u ] .
define LONG     [ a: | e: | i: | o: | u: | a | e | i | o | u ] .
define DIPHTHONG [ a.w | a.y | i.w | i.y ] .

!
! ============================================================
! PROPRETONIC REDUCTION
! In open syllable before stressed syllable:
! qamets → shewa
! tsere → shewa
! ============================================================

define Propretonic_Reduction_Qamets
  a -> 0 || C Vowel _ C a: .
  
define Propretonic_Reduction_Tsere  
  e -> 0 || C Vowel _ C e: .

define Propretonic_Reduction_Patach
  a -> 0 || C Vowel _ C a .

!
! ============================================================
! PRETONIC ADJUSTMENTS
! Lengthening in some environments, reduction in others
! ============================================================

define Pretonic_Lengthening
  a -> a: || _ C a .
  e -> e: || _ C e .

define Pretonic_Reduction
  a: -> a || _ C 0 .
  e: -> e || _ C 0 .

!
! ============================================================
! CLOSED SYLLABLE SHORTENING
! Long vowels shorten in closed unaccented syllables
! ============================================================

define Closed_Syllable_Shorten
  a: -> a || C _ C .
  e: -> e || C _ C .
  i: -> i || C _ C .
  o: -> o || C _ C .
  u: -> u || C _ C .

!
! ============================================================
! VOWEL COALESCENCE
! Two adjacent vowels merge into one
! ============================================================

define Vowel_Coalescence
  a + a -> a: .
  a + i -> a: .
  a + u -> o: .
  e + e -> e: .
  i + i -> i: .
  o + a -> o: .

!
! ============================================================
! MAQQEF HANDLING
! Maqqef (hyphen) reduces following word
! ============================================================

define Maqqef_Reduction
  Vowel -> 0 || _ [ - | = ] .

!
! ============================================================
! METEG PLACEMENT  
! Meteg is a secondary stress marker
! ============================================================

define Meteg_Placement
  0 -> + || Vowel [ C Vowel | C C Vowel ] _ C .

!
! ============================================================
! Compose vowel rules
! ============================================================

define VowelRules
  Propretonic_Reduction_Qamets
  .o.
  Propretonic_Reduction_Tsere
  .o.
  Propretonic_Reduction_Patach
  .o.
  Pretonic_Lengthening
  .o.
  Pretonic_Reduction
  .o.
  Closed_Syllable_Shorten
  .o.
  Vowel_Coalescence
  .o.
  Maqqef_Reduction
  .o.
  Meteg_Placement
;

regex VowelRules;
